Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 2 Signal Whistles and Lights on Trains

46-8-170 through 46-8-172.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1908, p. 50, §§ 1, 2, 4; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2697, 2698; Penal Code 1910, § 526; Ga. L. 1918, p. 212, § 1; Ga. L. 1924, p. 173, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 66-409, 66-9911, 94-505, 94-9901; Ga. L. 1950, p. 112, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 76, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 4/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 4/SB 285 repealed and reserved this part, effective July 1, 2006.